inc/flattened/excel2fst/VTI.lexc
LEXICON VTI_in_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwaanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:siinigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:siigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwaangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwaambaanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwegibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwegobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwambanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwaagobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:siinigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:siigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwaangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwiingibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:siiwiingen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:siwaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:siwan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:sigwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:sinig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:sig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siwaang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siwang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:sing # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:siwaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siwegiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siwegoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:siwamban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:sigwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:sinigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:sigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siwaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:siwangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:singiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:waanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:wegwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:wanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:waagwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:nigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:gwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:waangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:wangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:waambaanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:wegibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:wegobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:wambanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:waagobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:nigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:gobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:waangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:wangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:wiingibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:wiingen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:yaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:yeg # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:yan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:waad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:nid # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:d # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:yaang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:yang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:ng # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:yaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:yegiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:yegoban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:yamban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:waapan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:nipan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:pan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:yaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:yangiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:ngiban # ;
